Utah statutes.
17B-1-112.   Publishing district information in telephone directory.
(1)  Each local district with a total annual budget over $5,000 shall:
(a)  subject to Subsection (2), provide the name, telephone number, and
address of the district to the telephone directory publisher serving the
geographic area within which the district is located; and
(b)  request the telephone directory publisher to publish the district's name,
telephone number, and address in the government or other appropriate
government-related section of the publisher's telephone directory that serves
the area within which the district is located.
(2)  If the district does not have a telephone or address or both, the
district shall provide the telephone number or address or both, as the case
may be, of the district's officer in charge of the district's day to day
operations, for and in the place of the telephone number or address or both of
the district.
(3)  Subsection (1) does not apply to a local district whose name, telephone
number, and address are published in the government or other appropriate
government-related section of the telephone directory of the telephone
directory publisher serving the geographic area within which the local
district is located.
